Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 4.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201070-1013
Electric generation
facilities and transmission lines; application; hearing; waiver; appearances;
objections; amendments.

Upon application being
filed under section 70-1012, the board shall fix a time and place for hearing
and shall give ten days' notice by mail to such power suppliers as it deems to be
affected by the application. The hearing shall be held within sixty days unless for good cause shown the applicant requests in writing that such hearing not be
scheduled until a later time, but in any event such hearing shall be held not more than one hundred twenty days from
the filing of the application and
the board shall give its decision within sixty days after the conclusion
of the hearing. Any parties interested may appear, file objections, and offer
evidence. The board
may grant the application without notice or hearing, upon the filing of such
waivers as it may require, if in its judgment the finding required by section
70-1014 can be made without a hearing. Such hearing shall be conducted as
provided in section 70-1006. The board may allow amendments to the application,
in the interests of justice.

Laws 1963, c. 397, § 13, p. 1265;

Laws 1967, c. 425, § 1, p. 1301;

Laws 2010, LB1048, § 4.

The requirement that the hearing be held within thirty days unless a continuance has been requested by the applicant is directory, not mandatory. Omaha P. P. Dist. v. Nebraska P. P. Project, 196 Neb. 477, 243 N.W.2d 770 (1976).

This section provides for filing of application, notice, and hearing of matters authorized under preceding section. City of Auburn v. Eastern Nebraska Public Power Dist., 179 Neb. 439, 138 N.W.2d 629 (1965).